Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-15,171
Housing agency for city of the metropolitan class; annual report; contents.

A housing agency for a city of the metropolitan class shall submit a report annually to the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature. The report shall include:

(1) Information regarding any pest control management activities undertaken during the year covered by the report;

(2) The number of eviction filings during the year covered by the report;

(3) The number, nature, and resolution of complaints or grievances filed during the year covered by the report;

(4) Current occupancy rates; and

(5) Any relevant updates from meetings of the agency's board of commissioners.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 94.
July 18, 2026